Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF492.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; HOMETOWN HERO OUTDOORS.new text end new text begin $250,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $250,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of veterans affairs to provide a grant to Hometown Hero Outdoors, a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization based in Stillwater, Minnesota, to fund outdoor recreational activities and mental health services for currently serving military personnel and veterans to promote positive mental health and interactions with mental health service professionals; to promote longevity and quality of life through outdoor activities and mental health services, including public education; and to ensure the organization is able to continue supporting persons who are currently serving or have served in the military. new text end